District of Columbia statutes.
47-2886.06

Omitted

District of Columbia Board of Registration for Professional Engineers — Compensation.

Omitted.

This section is referenced in § 47-2886.13.
1981 Ed., § 2-2306.

The provisions of former § 2-2306 1981 Ed. have been omitted as obsolete, the Board referred to herein having been abolished.

Board of Registration for Professional Engineers abolished. See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-2886.05.

Section 302 of D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.